Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,214
Judgment; payment; effect.

Payment and receipt of the amount due on any judgment rendered in any action brought under the provisions of sections 25-21,201 to 25-21,215 shall be a full discharge of the state in such matter, and any final judgment shall forever bar further controversy upon the subject matter thereof.

Laws 1877, § 15, p. 23;

R.S.1913, § 1191;

C.S.1922, § 1113;

C.S.1929, § 27-332;

R.S.1943, § 24-332;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-332.